Tennessee, session 114, SB1049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-118, is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days' notice" and substituting "forty-five (45) days' notice".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1049
003259
- 1 -